pt-PT: Forma do gelo: Bala; Crescente; Cubo; Floco; Gourmet (cartola); Pepita/pellet; Raspado; Esfera; Outro
da: Isform: Bullet; Halvmåneformet; Terning; Flage; Gourmet (tophat); Nugget/kugle; Høvlet; Kugle; Andet
en: Ice shape: Bullet; Crescent; Cube; Flake; Gourmet (top hat); Nugget/pellet; Shaved; Sphere; Other
cs: Tvar ledu: Dutý projektil; Půlměsíc; Kostka; Vločka; Klobouček; Nugetka/peletka; Ledová tříšť; Kulička; Jiné
el: Σχήμα πάγου: Μυτερός κώνος; Ημισέληνος; Κύβος; Νιφάδα; Γκουρμέ (καπέλο); Νουγκέτ/σφαιρίδιο; Ξυρισμένο; Σφαίρα; Άλλο
sk-SK: Tvar ľadu: Guľka; Polmesiac; Kocka; Vločka; Prémiový (valčekový); Hrudka/peleta; Strúhaný; Guľa; Iné
fr: Format de glace: Balle; Croissant; Cube; Flocon; Gourmet (haut-de-forme); Nugget/pellet; Glace pilée; Sphère; Autre
ko: 얼음 형태: 불릿; 크레센트; 큐브; 플레이크; 구르메(탑햇); 너겟/펠릿; 쉐이브; 구체; 기타
es: Forma del hielo: Viñeta; Creciente; Cubo; Copo; Gourmet; Pepita/pellet; Raspado; Esfera; Otros
zh-CN: 冰的形状: 子弹形; 新月形; 方块形; 片状; 美食家（高礼帽）; 颗粒/块; 刨冰; 球形; 其他
sl-SI: Oblika ledu: Bullet; Polmesec; Kocka; Kosmič; Gurman (cilinder); Zrno/pelet; Obrito; Krogla; Druga
de: Eisform: Kugel; Halbmond; Würfel; Flocke; Gourmet (Zylinder); Würfel/Nugget; Rasiert; Kugel; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Oblik leda: U obliku metka; Polumjesec; Kocka; Pahuljica; Gurmanski (cilindrični); Granule/kuglice; Usitnjeni; Sfera; Ostalo
vi: Hình dáng đá: Bullet; Hình trăng khuyết; Khối lập phương; Mảnh; Hình mũ cao bồi (mũ chóp cao); Đá viên dạng nhỏ/dạng viên nén; Bào; Khối cầu; Khác
pl: Kształt lodu: Pociskowy; Półksiężyc; Kostka; Płatki; Gourmet (kapelusz); Granulat / pellet; Lód kruszony; Kula; Pozostałe
it: Forma del ghiaccio: Proiettile; Mezzaluna; Cubo; Fiocco; Gourmet (cappello a cilindro); Pepita/pellet; Rasato; Sfera; Altro
pt-BR: Formato do gelo: Marcador; Meia-lua; Cubo; Floco; Gourmet (formato cartola); Nugget/pellet; Raspado; Esfera; Outro
nl: IJsvormen: Kogelvormig; Halve maan; Kubus; Schilfers; Gourmet (hoge hoed); Nugget/pellet; Geschaafd ijs; Bol; Overig
th: รูปทรงน้ำแข็ง: กระสุน; ทรงพระจันทร์เสี้ยว; ลูกบาศก์; เกล็ด; ทรงกูร์เมต์ (หมวกสูง); ทรงก้อนเล็ก/เพลเล็ต; แบบเกล็ดละเอียด; คอนกรีตทรงกลม; อื่นๆ
sv: Isform: Kula; Halvmåne; Kub; Flaga; Gourmet (hög hatt); Nugget/pellet; Rakad; Sfär; Övrigt
bg-BG: Форма за лед: Тип „патрон“; Полумесец; Кубче; Люспи; Гурме (цилиндър); Гранули/пелети; Стърготини; Сфера; Друго
nb: Isens form: Kule; Halvmåne; Kube; Flak; Gourmet (flosshatt); Klump/pellet; Barbert; Kule; Annet
tr: Buz şekli: Mermi; Hilal; Küp; Pul; Gurme (silindir şapka); Nugget/pelet; Kırpılmış; Küre; Diğer
fi: Jään muodot: Luoti; Puolikuu; Kuutio; Hiutale; Herkkusuu (sylinterihattu); Pelletti; Lastu; Pallo; Muu
ru: Форма льда: Пальчиковый; Полумесяц; Кубики; Хлопья; Гурман (цилиндр); Частицы/гранулы; Колотый; Шарики; Другой
lt-LT: Ledo Shapes: Kulka; Pusmėnulis; Kubelis; Drožlės; Gurmaniškas (cilindras); Gruolis/granulė; Drožlės; Sfera; Kita
ja: 氷の形状: バレット; クレセント; キューブ; フレーク; グルメ（シルクハット）; ナゲット/ペレット; シェーブ; 球; その他
hu: A jég formája: Golyó; Félhold; Kocka; Pehely; Ínyenc (cilinder); Falat/gömböcske; Jégkása; Gömb; Egyéb
zh-TW: 冰塊形狀: 子彈形; 弦月形; 立方體; 片狀; 美食家 (禮帽形); 晶鑽冰; 刨冰; 球狀; 其他
ro-RO: Formă de gheață: Glonț; Semilună; Cub; Fulg; Gourmet (joben); Pepită/peletă; Ras; Sferă; Altele